Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; NEW PATHWAYS.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to New Pathways, Inc., to design, construct, furnish, and equip a regional shelter facility to provide comprehensive support services for families with children experiencing homelessness in the city of Cambridge and the surrounding area. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end